Wyoming, session 2026, HB0154.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-2-217(e) by creating a new
paragraph (vi) and by creating new subsections (n) and (o)
is amended to read:

31-2-217. Special plates; Pearl Harbor survivors;
national guard members; armed forces veterans; purple heart
recipients; women armed forces veteran decals; Wyoming
armed forces veteran decals.
HB0154

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0451

(e) Any person who is a Wyoming resident at the time
of application may apply under this section for:

(vi) A Wyoming veteran decal by presenting
documentation that the person is an honorably discharged
veteran of the United States armed forces who resides in
Wyoming.

(n) The decal designating a Wyoming veteran shall
bear a distinctive symbol or letters identifying the
registrant as an honorably discharged veteran of the United
States armed forces who resides in Wyoming. The decal shall
be attached in the lower left corner of the license plate
without obscuring any other symbols, letters or numbers on
the license plate. Application forms shall be available at
all county treasurer's offices. Each applicant for a decal
under this subsection shall submit an administration fee
with the application. The fee shall be in an amount
determined by the department to be sufficient to recover
reasonable administrative costs of the decal, but not more
than five dollars ($5.00) per set of decals for any one (1)
vehicle. Upon completion of the application, receipt of the
HB0154

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0451
administration fee and issuance or renewal of a license
plate under this article, the county treasurer shall issue
to the applicant the number of decals corresponding to the
number of license plates issued or renewed. Decals issued
under this subsection shall not be required to be renewed
upon renewal of a license plate. The replacement fee for a
decal under this subsection shall be the same as for the
original decal. Any applicant for Wyoming veteran decals
under this subsection shall be:

(i) A Wyoming resident at the time of
application; and

(ii) An honorably discharged veteran who served
in the armed forces of the United States whose written
evidence of separation from the armed forces shows an
honorable discharge or the rendition of honorable military
service.

(o) A person may obtain a decal under either W.S.
31-2-217(n) or 31-2-217(m), but not both.

HB0154

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0451
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0154